Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.270

Child custody—Temporary custody order, temporary parenting plan, or modification of custody decree—Affidavits required.

A party seeking a temporary custody order or a temporary parenting plan or modification of a custody decree or parenting plan shall submit together with his or her motion, an affidavit setting forth facts supporting the requested order or modification and shall give notice, together with a copy of his or her affidavit, to other parties to the proceedings, who may file opposing affidavits. The court shall deny the motion unless it finds that adequate cause for hearing the motion is established by the affidavits, in which case it shall set a date for hearing on an order to show cause why the requested order or modification should not be granted.

[ 2011 c 336 s 691; 1989 c 375 s 15; 1973 1st ex.s. c 157 s 27.]